District of Columbia statutes.
29-708.05

Liability after dissolution of general partner and person dissociated as general partner to limited partnership, other general partners, and persons dissociated as general partner.

(a)

If a general partner having knowledge of the dissolution causes a limited partnership to incur an obligation under § 29-708.04(a) by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the partnership’s activities and affairs, the general partner shall be liable:

(1)

To the limited partnership for any damage caused to the limited partnership arising from the obligation; and

(2)

If another general partner or a person dissociated as a general partner is liable for the obligation, to that other general partner or person for any damage caused to that other general partner or person arising from the liability.

(b)

If a person dissociated as a general partner causes a limited partnership to incur an obligation under § 29-708.04(b), the person shall be liable:

(1)

To the limited partnership for any damage caused to the limited partnership arising from the obligation; and

(2)

If a general partner or another person dissociated as a general partner is liable for the obligation, to the general partner or other person for any damage caused to the general partner or other person arising from the liability.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(9)(E), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities and affairs” for “activities” in (a).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 805 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.